zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 草皮和花園 > 戶外生活: 遮棚配件; 遮棚; 吊床零件配件; 吊床; 戶外用地毯; 戶外建物; 戶外傘和遮陽配件; 戶外傘/遮雨遮陽蓬; 鞦韆搖椅配件; 前廊鞦韆椅
es: Casa y jardín > Jardín > Artículos de exterior: Acessorios para toldos; Toldos; Piezas y accesorios para hamacas; Hamacas; Protectores para exterior; Estructuras de exteriores; Accesorios para sombrillas; Sombrillas; Accesorios de columpios para porche; Balancines de jardín
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 草坪与花园 > 户外生活用品: 遮阳篷配件; 遮阳篷; 吊床零件/配件; 吊床; 户外地垫/野餐垫; 户外建筑; 户外伞与遮阳幕布配件; 户外伞与遮阳幕布; 秋千配件; 户外摇椅
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Gramado e jardim > Espaços residenciais externos: Acessórios de toldos para janelas e portas; Toldos para janelas e portas; Acessórios para redes de descanso; Redes de descanso; Mantas para uso ao ar livre; Estruturas externas; Acessórios para guarda-chuva e guarda-sol; Guarda-chuvas e guarda-sóis; Acessórios para bancos de balanço; Balanços para varandas
ru: Дом и сад > Товары для придомовых и садовых участков > Отдых на открытом воздухе: Аксессуары для маркиз; Маркизы; Детали и аксессуары для гамаков; Гамаки; Уличные пледы; Уличные конструкции; Аксессуары для уличных зонтов и солнцезащитных навесов; Уличные зонты и солнцезащитные навесы; Аксессуары для садовых качелей; Садовые качели
th: บ้านและสวน > สนามและสวน > ชีวิตกลางแจ้ง: อุปกรณ์ของผ้าใบบังแดด; ผ้าใบบังแดด; อุปกรณ์และชิ้นส่วนเปลญวน; เปลญวน; ผ้าห่มที่ใช้กลางแจ้ง; สิ่งก่อสร้างกลางแจ้ง; อุปกรณ์ร่มและที่บังแดดกลางแจ้ง; ร่มและที่บังแดดกลางแจ้ง; อุปกรณ์สำหรับชิงช้า; ที่นั่งชิงช้าสำหรับระเบียง
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Çim ve Bahçe > Ev Dışında Yaşam: Pencere ve Kapı Tentesi Aksesuarları; Pencere ve Kapı Tenteleri; Hamak Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Hamaklar; Ev Dışı Battaniyeler; Dış Mekan Yapıları; Açık Hava Şemsiyeleri ve Deniz Şemsiyeleri Aksesuarları; Açık Hava Şemsiyeleri ve Deniz Şemsiyeleri; Veranda Hamak Aksesuarları; Veranda Salıncakları
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Gazon și grădină > Exterior: Accesorii pentru paravane; Paravane; Piese și accesorii pentru hamace; Hamace; Pături de exterior; Structuri de exterior; Accesorii pentru umbrele și parasolare de exterior; Umbrele și parasolare de exterior; Accesorii pentru leagăn pentru verandă; Leagăne pentru verandă
fr: Maison et jardin > Pelouses et jardins > Vie en extérieur: Accessoires pour stores extérieurs; Stores extérieurs; Accessoires et pièces pour hamacs; Hamacs; Couvertures d’extérieur; Structures extérieures; Accessoires pour parasols et voiles d’ombrage; Parasols et voiles d’ombrage; Accessoires pour balancelles; Balancelles de jardin
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Морава и градина > Живот на открито: Аксесоари за тенти; Тенти; Части и аксесоари за хамак; Хамаци; Одеяла за открито; Външни конструкции; Аксесоари за външни чадъри и сенници; Външни чадъри и сенници; Аксесоари за люлки за веранда; Люлки за веранда
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Veja ir sodas > Gyvenimas lauke: Markizių priedai; Markizės; Hamakų dalys ir priedai; Hamakai; Lauko antklodės; Lauko konstrukcijos; Lauko skėčių ir skėčių nuo saulės priedai; Lauko skėčiai ir skėčiai nuo saulės; Verandos sūpynių priedai; Verandos sūpynės
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Piha ja puutarha > Oleskelu ulkona: Markiisitarvikkeet; Markiisit; Riippumattojen osat ja tarvikkeet; Riippumatot; Ulkoviltit; Ulkorakennukset; Aurinkovarjojen ja -katosten lisätarvikkeet; Aurinkovarjot ja -katokset; Pihakeinujen lisätarvikkeet; Pihakeinut
de: Heim & Garten > Rasen & Garten > Garten & Balkon: Markisen-Zubehör; Markisen; Hängemattenteile & -zubehör; Hängematten; Outdoor-Decken; Gartenhäuschen & Gartenbauten; Zubehör für Sonnenschirme; Terrassen- & Sonnenschirme; Zubehör für Hollywoodschaukeln; Hollywoodschaukeln
nl: Huis en tuin > Tuin en gazon > Buitenleven: Accessoires voor zonwering voor ramen en deuren; Zonwering voor ramen en deuren; Onderdelen en accessoires voor hangmatten; Hangmatten; Buitensportdekens; Buitengebouwen; Accessoires voor parasols en zonweringen; Parasols; Accessoires voor verandaschommels; Verandaschommels
nb: Hjem og hage > Plen og hage > Leve ute: Tilbehør til fortelt; Fortelt; Hammockdeler og -tilbehør; Hammocker; Utendørstepper; Utendørsbygg; Tilbehør til parasoller og markiser; Parasoller og solskjerming; Tilbehør til hagehusker; Hagehusker
it: Casa e giardino > Prato e giardino > Vita all'aperto: Accessori per tende parasole; Tende parasole; Componenti e accessori per amache; Amache; Plaid da picnic; Strutture da esterno; Accessori per ombrelloni e parasole da esterno; Ombrelloni e parasole da esterni; Accessori per altalene da patio; Altalene da patio
sv: Hem och trädgård > Gräsmatta och trädgård > Utomhusliv: Markistillbehör; Markiser; Tillbehör till hängmattor; Hängmattor; Utomhusfiltar; Utomhusbyggnader; Tillbehör till parasoll och solskydd; Parasoll och solskydd; Tillbehör för hammockar; Hammockar
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Γκαζόν & κήπος > Υπαίθρια διαβίωση: Αξεσουάρ τέντας; Τέντες; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ αιώρας; Κούνιες (Hammocks); Κουβέρτες εξωτερικού χώρου; Εξωτερικές κατασκευές; Αξεσουάρ ομπρέλας και σκίαστρου εξωτερικού χώρου; Ομπρέλες & σκίαστρα εξωτερικού χώρου; Αξεσουάρ αιώρων για βεράντα; Αιώρες για βεράντα
pl: Dom i ogród > Trawnik i ogród > Akcesoria ogrodowe: Akcesoria do markiz; Markizy; Akcesoria i części do hamaków; Hamaki; Koce plażowe; Architektura ogrodowa; Akcesoria do parasoli i pawilonów ogrodowych; Parasole i pawilony ogrodowe; Akcesoria do huśtawek ogrodowych; Huśtawki ogrodowe
hu: Otthon és kert > Gyep és kert > Kültéri élet: Napellenző-kiegészítők; Napellenzők; Függőágy-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Függőágyak; Kültéri takarók; Kültéri szerkezetek; Kültéri esernyő- és napernyő-kiegészítők; Kültéri esernyők és napernyők; Teraszhinta-kiegészítők; Teraszhinták
en: Home & Garden > Lawn & Garden > Outdoor Living: Awning Accessories; Awnings; Hammock Parts & Accessories; Hammocks; Outdoor Blankets; Outdoor Structures; Outdoor Umbrella & Sunshade Accessories; Outdoor Umbrellas & Sunshades; Porch Swing Accessories; Porch Swings
cs: Dům a zahrada > Trávníky a zahrady > Bydlení na zahradě: Příslušenství k markýzám; Markýzy; Příslušenství k houpacím sítím; Hamaky a houpací sítě; Venkovní deky; Zahradní architektura; Venkovní slunečníky – příslušenství; Venkovní slunečníky a sluneční clony; Příslušenství k houpačkám; Houpací křesla
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Travnik in vrt > Bivanje na prostem: Dodatki za tende; Tende; Deli in dodatki za viseče mreže; Viseče mreže; Zunanje odeje; Zunanje konstrukcije; Dodatki za zunanje dežnike in senčnike; Zunanji dežniki in senčniki; Dodatki za vrtne gugalnice; Vrtne gugalnice
da: Hjem og have > Græsplæne og have > Udendørsliv: Tilbehør til markiser; Markiser; Tilbehør til hængekøjer; Hængekøjer; Udendørstæpper; Udendørskonstruktioner; Parasoller og solskærme – tilbehør; Parasoller og solskærme; Tilbehør til gyngesofaer; Gyngesofaer
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > ガーデン用品・ガーデン機器 > 屋外用家具・エクステリア: 窓・ドア用オーニング関連小物; 窓・ドア用オーニング; ハンモック関連小物; ハンモック; アウトドア用毛布・敷物; エクステリア; パラソル・日よけ関連小物; パラソル・日よけ; スウィング ベンチ用品; スウィングベンチ
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Travnjak i vrt > Boravak na otvorenom: Pribor za tende; Tende; Dijelovi i pribor za viseće mreže; Viseće mreže; Vanjski pokrivači; Vanjske konstrukcije; Pribor za suncobrane i tende; Suncobrani i tende; Pribor za ljuljačke za trijem; Ljuljačke za trijem
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 잔디/정원 > 야외활동 용품: 차양 부대용품; 차양; 해먹 부품/부대용품; 해먹; 야외용 담요; 야외 구조물; 파라솔/그늘막 부대용품; 파라솔/그늘막; 벤치용 그네 부대용품; 그네의자
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Relva e jardim > Vida ao ar livre: Acessórios para toldos; Toldos; Peças e acessórios para redes; Redes; Mantas para exterior; Estruturas para exterior; Guarda-sol e acessórios para sombra; Guarda-sóis e toldos; Acessórios para baloiço de alpendre; Baloiços de alpendre
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bãi cỏ và vườn > Cuộc sống ngoài trời: Phụ kiện mái hiên; Mái hiên; Phụ kiện và phụ tùng võng; Võng; Tấm trải ngoài trời; Kết cấu ngoài trời; Phụ tùng che nắng ngoài trời; Dù và bạt che nắng ngoài trời; Phụ kiện ghế xích đu mái hiên; Xích đu mái vòm
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Trávnik a záhrada > Terasa: Príslušenstvo pre markízy; Markízy; Diely a príslušenstvo k hojdacej sieti; Hojdacie siete; Vonkajšie deky; Vonkajšie konštrukcie; Príslušenstvo pre záhradné slnečníky a tieniace plachty; Záhradné slnečníky a tieniace plachty; Príslušenstvo pre verandovú hojdačku; Verandové hojdačky